Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.651

Fuel cells and renewable or alternative energy sources.

(1) When planning for the capital construction or renovation of a state facility, state agencies shall consider the utilization of fuel cells and renewable or alternative energy sources as a primary source of power for applications that require an uninterruptible power source.

(2) When planning the purchase of backup or emergency power systems and remote power systems, state agencies shall consider the utilization of fuel cells and renewable or alternative energy sources instead of batteries or internal combustion engines.

(3) The director of enterprise services shall develop criteria by which state agencies can identify, evaluate, and develop potential fuel cell applications at state facilities.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates electric energy by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence of a catalyst.

[ 2015 c 225 s 66; 2003 c 340 s 1.]

NOTES: